Florida, session 2026, SB628.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âTransportation facility designations; Department 14 of Transportation to erect suitable markers.â 15 (1)âThat portion of S.R. 295/Navy Boulevard between Duncan 16 Road and S.R. 292/Gulf Beach Highway in Escambia County is 17 designated as âWarrior Sacrifice Way.â 18 (2)âThat portion of U.S. 90 in Baker County between N. 3rd 19 Street and the Nassau County line is designated as âState 20 Representative/Circuit Judge Hon. John J. Crews, Jr., Memorial 21 Highway.â 22 (3)âThat portion of U.S. 41 between North Creek and 23 Blackburn Point Road in Sarasota County is designated as âDickey 24 Betts Memorial Highway.â 25 (4)âThat portion of S.R. 5/U.S. 1 between N.E. 38th Street 26 and E. Commercial Boulevard in Broward County is designated as 27 âPhil Smith Memorial Highway.â 28 (5)âThat portion of S.R. 46 between Sanford Avenue and E. 29 Lake Mary Boulevard in Seminole County is designated as âMayor 30 Larry A. Dale Memorial Highway.â 31 (6)âThe northbound off-ramp from U.S. 1 Alternate/Martin 32 Luther King, Jr., Parkway to E. 21st Street in Duval County is 33 designated as âTerry L. Fields Memorial Access.â 34 (7)âThat portion of S.R. 842/East Las Olas Boulevard 35 between South Andrews Avenue and S.E. 6th Avenue in Broward 36 County is designated as âTerry Stiles Memorial Boulevard.â 37 (8)âThat portion of S.R. A1A between the north end of the 38 Hillsboro Inlet and the next mile marker north of 991 Hillsboro 39 Mile in Broward County is designated as âRick Case Memorial 40 Highway.â 41 (9)âThat portion of S.R. 968/S.W. 1st Street between S.W. 42 17th Avenue and S.W. 19th Avenue in Miami-Dade County is 43 designated as âCharles Dascal Way.â 44 (10)âThat portion of Halifax Drive between Granada Blvd. 45 North and John Anderson Drive in Volusia County is designated as 46 âLowell Lohman Road.â 47 (11)âThe access road leading to the Daytona Regional 48 Chamber of Commerce located at 126 East Orange Avenue in Daytona 49 Beach in Volusia County is designated as âGeorge Mirabal Road.â 50 (12)âThat portion of U.S. 331 between U.S. 90 and the 51 bridge crossing the Choctawhatchee Bay in Walton County is 52 designated as the âEsteena K. Wells Memorial Highway.â 53 (13)âThat portion of S.R. 85/N.E. Eglin Parkway between 54 Richbourg Avenue and Florida Place S.E. in Okaloosa County is 55 designated as âSuperintendent Pledger V. Sullivan Memorial 56 Highway.â 57 (14)âThat portion of College Avenue between Copeland Street 58 and South Monroe Street in Leon County is designated as 59 âPresident John Thrasher Memorial Boulevard.â 60 (15)âNotwithstanding s. 334.071(3), Florida Statutes, the 61 airport located at 3300 Capital Circle Southwest in Tallahassee, 62 or nearest thereto, is designated as the âBobby Bowden 63 Tallahassee International Airport.â 64 (16)âNotwithstanding s. 334.071(3), Florida Statutes, the 65 entirety of S.R. 80, consisting of the 124 contiguous miles of 66 highway stretching from S.R. A1A/S. Ocean Boulevard in Palm 67 Beach County, continuing westward through Hendry County, and 68 ending at a junction with U.S. 41/Cleveland Avenue in Lee 69 County, is designated as âPresident Donald J. Trump Highway.â 70 This designation shall replace and expand the designation 71 adopted in ch. 2025-214, Laws of Florida, for that portion of 72 Southern Boulevard between Kirk Road and S. Ocean Boulevard in 73 Palm Beach County. 74 (17)âThe Department of Transportation is directed to erect 75 suitable markers designating the transportation facilities as 76 described in this section. 77 Section 2.âSection 8 of chapter 2006-316, Laws of Florida, 78 is amended to read: 79 Section 8.âSenator N. Ray Carroll Memorial Interchange 80 designated; Department of Transportation to erect suitable 81 markers.â 82 (1)âUpon completion of construction, the new Nolte Road 83 interchange The Florida Turnpike interchange being constructed 84 at Milepost 240 and Kissimmee Park Road in Osceola County is 85 designated as âSenator N. Ray Carroll Memorial Interchange.â 86 (2)âThe Department of Transportation is directed to erect 87 suitable markers designating Senator N. Ray Carroll Memorial 88 Interchange as described in subsection (1). 89 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.